Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3307.02
Equine, cat, and dog massage practice, defined.

Equine, cat, and dog massage practice means the application of hands-on massage techniques for the purpose of increasing circulation, relaxing muscle spasms, relieving tension, enhancing muscle tone, and increasing range of motion in equines, cats, and dogs.

Laws 2018, LB596, § 3.